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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE
DTC P0325/52 | Knock Sensor 1 Circuit Malfunction
DTC P0330/55 | Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Malfunction
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Knock sensors are fitted to the cylinder block to detect engine knocking. This sensor contains a piezoelectric
element which generates a voltage when it becomes deformed, which occurs when the cylinder block vi-
brates due to knocking. If engine knocking occurs, ignition timing is retarded to suppress it.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

. Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air —fuelratioleanorrich, etc. atthetime
of the malfunction.

. DTC P0325/52is forthe knock sensor circuit onthe front side.

. DTC P0330/55is forthe knock sensor circuitonthe rear side.

1 Check continuity betweenterminal KNK 1, KNK2 of engine ECU connectorand
body ground.

PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E12 connector of engine ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal KNK1, KNK2 of engine
ECU connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 1 M2 or higher

A05856

: Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
KNK signal waveform

0.5V/ . Withthe engineracing (4,000 rpm) measure betweenter-
Division minal KNK1, KNK2 of engine ECU and body ground.
) HINT:
oV The correct waveform is as shown.

. Spreadthetime onthe horizontal axis, and confirmthat
period ofthewaveis164  u sec.
(Normal mode vibration frequency of knock sensor:

5 m sec./Division 6.1 kHz).
0.5V/ HINT:
Division If normal mode vibration frequency is not 6.1 kHz the sensor is
I - malfunctioning.
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200 usec./Division
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0K> Go to step 3.
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2 Check knock sensor.

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
knock sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Replace knock sensor.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

4 Does malfunction disappear when a good knock sensor is installed?

@

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

YES> Replace knock sensor.
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